Wyoming statutes. Title 7 Criminal Procedure
Chapter 9 Victim Restitution
§ 7-9-103.
Determination of amount owed; execution.

As part of the sentencing process including deferred prosecutions under W.S.

7-13-301

, in any misdemeanor or felony case, the prosecuting attorney shall present to the court any claim for restitution submitted by any victim.

In every case in which a claim for restitution is submitted, the court shall fix a reasonable amount as restitution owed to each victim for actual pecuniary damage resulting from the defendant’s criminal activity, and shall include its determination of the pecuniary damage as a special finding in the judgment of conviction or in the order placing the defendant on probation under W.S.

7-13-301

. In determining the amount of restitution, the court shall consider and include as a special finding, each victim’s reasonably foreseeable actual pecuniary damage that will result in the future as a result of the defendant’s criminal activity. A long-term physical health care restitution order shall be entered as provided in W.S.

7-9-113

through

7-9-115

.

The court shall order the defendant to pay all or part of the restitution claimed or shall state on the record specific reasons why an order for restitution was not entered. If the court determines that the defendant has no ability to pay and that no reasonable probability exists that the defendant will have an ability to pay in the future, the court shall enter specific findings in the record supporting its determination.

Any order for restitution under this chapter constitutes a judgment by operation of law on the date it is entered. To satisfy the judgment, the clerk, upon request of the victim, the division of victim services or the district attorney, shall issue execution in the same manner as in a civil action.

The court’s determination of the amount of restitution owed under this section is not admissible as evidence in any civil action.

The defendant shall be given credit against his restitution obligation for payments made to the victim by the defendant’s insurer for injuries arising out of the same facts or event.

History.

Laws 1984, ch. 27, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

7-13-109

; Laws 1987, ch. 157, § 3; 1991, ch. 77, § 1; ch. 155, § 1; ch. 167, § 2; 2000, ch. 90, § 1; 2011, ch. 30, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to attachment, replevin and garnishment, see chapter 15 of title 1.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in (d), inserted “the division of victim services,” and substituted “shall issue” for “may issue.”

Losses covered by insurance. —

Defendant was properly ordered to pay restitution to an insured victim because (1) there was no evidence in the record of a subrogation right, or lack thereof, so the insurer was not a victim entitled to restitution, (2) it was absurd not to order the defendant to pay anyone for damage defendant caused, and (3) equitable subrogation did not assist defendant, since, if a right of subrogation existed, the court had to award restitution to the owner of property defendant damaged, and (4) whether the victim would receive a double recovery was of no consequence, since restitution was a criminal penalty meant to have deterrent and rehabilitative effects. Hudson v. State, 2020 WY 86, 466 P.3d 839,

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 94

(Wyo. 2020).

Court's authority. —

Restitution is not limited to the amount that must be proved for conviction so long as the amount ordered is consistent with the applicable Wyoming statutes. Kuebel v. State, 2019 WY 75, 446 P.3d 179,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 76

(Wyo. 2019).

Types of damages awardable. —

Section

7-9-101

and this section allow a court in a criminal case to award as restitution the same damages as are available in a civil case; however, certain types of damages, such as punitive damages and damages for pain, suffering, mental anguish, and loss of consortium, may not be awarded. Meerscheidt v. State, 931 P.2d 220,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(Wyo. 1997).

Court's authority.—

Nothing in Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 7-9-103(d) operates to restrict a sentencing court’s authority; the provision facilitates executions by victims, the division of victims services, and district attorneys, but it contains no language restricting the district court’s authority to otherwise impose probation conditions to facilitate the payment of restitution. Anderson v. State, 2018 WY 6, 408 P.3d 1148,

2018 Wyo. LEXIS 6

(Wyo. 2018).

“Pecuniary damage.” —

The trial court erred by awarding restitution to crime victims for their loss of enjoyment of life, because the legislature intended to exclude such damages from the definition of “pecuniary damages.” Meerscheidt v. State, 931 P.2d 220,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(Wyo. 1997).

Defendant's judgment and sentence violated Wyo. R. Crim. P. 32(c)(2)(H) where, under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 7-9-103(b) and Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 7-9-101(a)(iii), the sentencing court did not specify a victim, and it was impossible to tell if “loss of support” fit the statutory definition of “pecuniary damage”; the state failed to prove a victim's legal entitlement to restitution.
Hite v. State, 2007 WY 199, 172 P.3d 737,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 212

(Wyo. 2007).

In a criminal action, the record was insufficiently specific to permit the conclusion that the “loss of support” portion of the restitution order comported with statutory definition of “pecuniary damages.”
Jones v. State, 2009 WY 33, 203 P.3d 1091,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(Wyo. 2009).

Damage resulting from “criminal activity.” —

Crimes for which defendant could be ordered to pay restitution included only those to which he pleaded guilty and those he admitted in his plea agreement, and since defendant denied taking personal property from truck and, after preliminary hearing, district court dismissed count charging him with larceny of those items, court was without authority to order restitution for value of items. Van Riper v. State, 999 P.2d 646,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 52

(Wyo. 2000).

Where defendant admitted in writing to defendant's employer that defendant stole cameras, CDs, and DVDs, but only the cameras were mentioned in the criminal proceeding for larceny, it was error to order restitution under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 7-9-101(a)(i) for the DVDs and CDs because defendant did not admit to the crimes in the context of a criminal proceeding. Coleman v. State, 2005 WY 69, 115 P.3d 411,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 81

(Wyo. 2005).

In a case in which defendant pleaded guilty to receiving stolen property pursuant to a plea agreement, the district court had no authority to order defendant to pay restitution to burglary victims where defendant did not plead guilty to the burglaries or conspiracy to commit the burglaries and did not, as part of his plea agreement, agree to pay restitution to the burglary victims; the district court's authority to order restitution was limited to pecuniary damages incurred by victims arising from that criminal activity, but the restitution award was predicated upon the pecuniary loss resulting from the burglaries, not the criminal activity admitted to by defendant.
Crapo v. State, 2007 WY 194, 172 P.3d 393,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 205

(Wyo. 2007).

Probation revocation unconstitutional absent capacity to pay. —

The convicted person cannot be subjected to revocation of probation for noncompliance with restitution unless, in accord with the statutes, a plan has been developed which demonstrates the required criteria, including capacity to pay. In the absence of capacity to pay with reasonable effort made, imprisonment for debt occurs in contravention of art. 1, § 5, Wyo. Const.Seaton v. State, 811 P.2d 276,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 79

(Wyo. 1991).

Ability to pay not a condition precedent. —

The first sentence of subsection (a) which indicates that finding an ability to pay is a condition precedent to ordering restitution is to be disregarded. Murray v. State, 855 P.2d 350,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 110

(Wyo. 1993), reh'g denied,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 129

(Wyo. July 20, 1993), cert. denied, 510 U.S. 1045, 114 S. Ct. 693, 126 L. Ed. 2d 660, 1994 U.S. LEXIS 129 (U.S. 1994).

Where the district court ordered $335,387 in restitution and did
not find defendant unable to pay, it was not required to make any
factual findings as to ability to pay. The conclusion that defendant
was not unable to pay over time was supported by the facts that defendant
was young and apparently capable, and an employer was willing to let
him work 10-to-12-hour shifts at a minimum of $10 per hour. Smith v. State, 2012 WY 130, 286 P.3d 429,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 137

(Wyo. 2012).

District court did not err in ordering defendant to pay restitution as it was not shown that there was no reasonable probability that defendant could at some future point in time assist her husband in paying a portion of the ordered restitution because the court was not required to analyze defendant’s financial resources in detail or to make findings as to her income or financial obligations; there was no evidence that her physical condition could not improve or otherwise allow her to earn money through prison work in the course of her lengthy incarceration; and no evidence was introduced that the government assistance she received would be eliminated once she was imprisoned. Smiley v. State, 2018 WY 50, 417 P.3d 174,

2018 Wyo. LEXIS 51

(Wyo. 2018).

Minimal inquiry into defendant's ability to pay sufficient. —

The court's actions in ordering restitution at sentencing without engaging in a reasoned inquiry into the defendant's ability to pay was proper under this section because there is no statutory requirement that the court inquire into the defendant's ability to pay at the time of sentencing. Dreiman v. State, 825 P.2d 758,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(Wyo. 1992).

Amount must be specified. —

Subsection (a) requires that a trial court fix a specific amount of restitution. Leger v. State, 855 P.2d 359,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 117

(Wyo. 1993).

A trial court erred in ordering convicted arsonists to pay for the future moving expenses of their victims where the court (1) did not make a finding that the moving expenses were reasonably foreseeable, actual pecuniary damages, and (2) did not specify the actual restitution amount at the time of sentencing. Meerscheidt v. State, 931 P.2d 220,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(Wyo. 1997).

This section requires court to order restitution in a fixed, reasonable amount unless it specifically finds defendant is unable to pay, and amount should be supported by evidence sufficient to afford a reasonable basis for estimating the loss; a challenge to the amount of restitution must demonstrate an abuse of discretion. Brock v. State, 967 P.2d 26,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 159

(Wyo. 1998).

Defendant properly advised. —

District court properly advised defendant, prior to acceptance of his guilty plea, of his potential restitution obligation where the court specifically advised defendant that there were money losses, and that he might well be required to pay those as restitution and he confirmed that he had understood the advisement and had no questions. Whitten v. State, 2005 WY 55, 110 P.3d 892,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 63

(Wyo. 2005).

Fair market value an appropriate measure. —

After defendant pled guilty to wrongfully taking or disposing of property, a district court erred by failing to set restitution based on the readily ascertainable fair market value of a stolen pickup truck because there was no support for the contention that the truck had a special, unique, or sentimental value. Bush v. State, 2003 WY 156, 79 P.3d 1178,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 186

(Wyo. 2003).

Burden of proof. —

Proof of the restitution amount as a question of the sentence need only be proved by credible evidence, by a preponderance, or burden, of the evidence. Renfro v. State, 785 P.2d 491,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(Wyo. 1990).

Determining reasonableness of restitution. —

The court's refusal to hear defendant's objection to the amount of restitution set by the court vitiated the “knowing” quality of defendant's waiver and rendered it impossible to determine, from the record, whether the amount finally determined was, indeed, reasonable. Aldridge v. State, 956 P.2d 341,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 45

(Wyo. 1998).

Restitution withdrawn from prison earnings. —

District court did not by ordering restitution that the Department of Corrections could withdraw from defendant's prison earnings because unless the district court found that defendant was unable to pay restitution, it was required to set the total amount she had to repay the victim, and its order to that effect constituted a judgment upon which the victim could execute. McEwan v. State, 2013 WY 158, 314 P.3d 1160,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 164

(Wyo. 2013).

Challenge to amount of restitution. —

The defendant must challenge the amount of restitution determined at sentencing (or within the time permitted by the rules after sentencing) or the amount is fixed as res judicata, not subject to attack at a probation revocation hearing. Badura v. State, 832 P.2d 1390,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 72

(Wyo. 1992).

Any challenge by the defendant concerning the restitution amount was waived by agreeing to a plan of restitution containing a specific amount owed and monthly payments and by making the required payments under the plan. Daniels v. State, 909 P.2d 972,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(Wyo. 1996).

The demand for a hearing to develop a factual showing in the record concerning the reasonableness of the restitution amount is a challenge to the terms of the probation agreement. Any challenge to the validity of a probation agreement term must be made when the amount of restitution is determined at sentencing or within the time permitted by the rules after sentencing. Daniels v. State, 909 P.2d 972,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(Wyo. 1996).

After defendant was convicted of felony property destruction, he claimed that the district court erred in ordering him to pay restitution in the amount of $1,400, the estimated value of the vehicle before the damage; it was not clear whether the district court ordered defendant to pay that amount because defense counsel did not object to the presentence investigation or because it concluded that the fair market value was the appropriate measure of restitution, Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 7-9-103(b). Defense counsel did not waive the issue by his failure to object to the PSI because he sufficiently placed it before the sentencing court in challenging the appropriateness of the amount at the sentencing hearing and should the issue arise in any proceedings upon remand, the district court was required to take into account the prevailing law under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 7-9-101(a)(iii).
Morris v. State, 2009 WY 88, 210 P.3d 1101,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 96

(Wyo. 2009).

In a larceny by bailee case, a restitution order was erroneous due to calculation errors made by the prosecution, and this amount was not offset by a claim made by the State. Moreover, there was no abuse of discretion in failing to find that certain expenses were legitimate where such claim was rejected by the jury, and no new evidence was offered on appeal. Hibsman v. State, 2015 WY 122, 355 P.3d 1240,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 137

(Wyo. 2015).

Evidence sufficient to support restitution order. —

Evidence was sufficient to afford the court a reasonable basis for estimating the victim's loss, and the court's restitution order was therefore appropriate. Hilterbrand v. State, 930 P.2d 1248,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 6

(Wyo. 1997).

Trial court did not err in ordering a battery defendant to pay restitution to the victim because: (1) there was substantial evidence showing that defendant inflicted the victim's injuries, (2) the victim could have recovered damages in the amount of her medical bills in a civil action, and (3) a reasonable probability existed that defendant had or would have an ability to pay.
Glover v. State, 2007 WY 169, 169 P.3d 553,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 182

(Wyo. 2007).

District court did not abuse its discretion in sentencing defendant to make restitution in the amount of $500, where mother of minor with whom defendant had taken indecent liberties requested in victim impact statement that defendant pay her insurance policy deductible of $500 to cover costs of counseling for daughter; this information was sufficient to afford a reasonable basis for estimating the victim's loss. Brock v. State, 967 P.2d 26,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 159

(Wyo. 1998).

District court did not abuse its discretion in ordering restitution against defendant where the victims' testimony concerning the value of their claims was credible and uncontradicted and based on the actual or fair market value of the items. Brown v. State, 2003 WY 72, 70 P.3d 238,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 89

(Wyo. 2003).

In a case in which defendant was convicted of being an accessory to the second-degree sexual abuse of a minor and third-degree sexual abuse of a second minor, defendant and her husband were jointly and severally liable for the requested amount of restitution of $17,515.20 to Wyoming Medicaid for its expenditures on behalf of the second victim as a result of defendant’s offenses because the presentence investigation report and the victim impact statement made by the second victim’s mother at the sentencing hearing together provided minimal but sufficient support for the district court’s award as the mother’s statement established that her daughter’s treatment included two periods of residential treatment at the Wyoming Behavioral Institute. Smiley v. State, 2018 WY 50, 417 P.3d 174,

2018 Wyo. LEXIS 51

(Wyo. 2018).

District court did not abuse its discretion by ordering restitution in an amount greater than $1,000 for the misdemeanor theft conviction of a motorcycle where the State called a witness who testified that he had nearly life-long experience working with motorcycles, jet skis and cars, the witness was familiar with the Norton motorcycles owned by the victims, he testified, without objection, that the motorcycle had a value between $2,500 and $3,500, and defendant testified that the motorcycle was in poor condition, but he presented no contrary evidence as to its value. Kuebel v. State, 2019 WY 75, 446 P.3d 179,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 76

(Wyo. 2019).

District court acted within its authority in awarding restitution for the victim's personal items that were inside his stolen vehicle because defendant admitted to stealing the vehicle and a jury convicted him of felony larceny, when defendant stole the vehicle, he stole the items that were contained therein, and defendant never denied taking the personal property, and at sentencing never contested the restitution requested on the stolen items. Layton v. State, 2007 WY 1, 150 P.3d 173,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 1

(Wyo. 2007).

Evidence insufficient to support restitution order. —

Restitution
order was not supported by sufficient evidence because, even though
restitution was generally measured by the damages to the victim,
the
State could not ignore the terms of the plea agreement, which
limited
the amount of defendant's restitution to amounts that he
actually
received. The State did not meet its burden of proving that
defendant
received or otherwise benefitted from a welfare fraud scheme
in the
amount of $ 2,600.15. O'Halloran v. State, 2014 WY 95, 331 P.3d 121,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 111

(Wyo. 2014).

Prosecuting attorney's comments not considered evidence. —

Comments of the prosecuting attorney, unless identifying trial evidence or directing attention to file documentation or other credible evidence, cannot be substituted for proof of the amount of restitution. Renfro v. State, 785 P.2d 491,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(Wyo. 1990).

Sentencing court authorized to impose restitution. —

The correct reading of §§

7-9-102

and -103 and § 7-13-421(b), collectively, is that these statutes specifically authorize a sentencing court to impose restitution ordered a condition of parole unless the Board of Parole intervenes. Helmlinger v. State, 855 P.2d 363,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 115

(Wyo. 1993).

District court had authority to order the appellant to pay the costs of a forensic examination to the agency that ordered the examination where the agency suffered pecuniary damage as a result of the appellant's crime and the agency's statement as to the amount of the examination was credible evidence upon which to impose restitution.
Frederick v. State, 2007 WY 27, 151 P.3d 1136,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 2007).

Losses covered by insurance. —

Although homeowner's insurance covered some of his victims' losses, the court refused to relieve defendant of the restitution obligation as described by his plea agreement, because the court was uninterested in rewarding a confessed burglar for the foresight of his victims in maintaining insurance coverage, and even less intrigued by the notion of allowing a felon to profit from his criminal enterprise. Williams v. State, 949 P.2d 878,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 160

(Wyo. 1997).

Collateral source rule. —

Court rejected defendant's concern that the individual victims may have received a windfall in the form of duplicative insurance and restitution payments in violation of the collateral source, because the collateral source rule has application to tort cases and is inapposite in the context of criminal law. Williams v. State, 949 P.2d 878,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 160

(Wyo. 1997).

Satisfaction. —

Trial court properly ruled that a civil liability settlement entered into by defendant, who was convicted of reckless endangering, with the victims of his criminal conduct did not extinguish the restitution order earlier imposed against him. Abeyta v. State, 2002 WY 44, 42 P.3d 1009,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 45

(Wyo. 2002).

Restitution plan. —

District court did not have authority under this section to require defendant to make a “bona fide effort” to have a total $335,387 of restitution paid within a five-year period. A restitution plan could not be imposed because the one-year jail sentence was not suspended. Smith v. State, 2012 WY 130, 286 P.3d 429,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 137

(Wyo. 2012).

Statutory requirement that court make finding waived by defendant. —

The statutory requirement that the trial court, for purposes of restitution, make a specific finding as to the amount of pecuniary damage supported by credible evidence in the record is a right personal to the defendant which she may waive. The defendant waived this requirement by agreeing to a plan of restitution containing a specific figure owed with fixed monthly payments, and by making some payments under the plan. Kahlsdorf v. State, 823 P.2d 1184,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 202

(Wyo. 1991) (decided under prior law).

Waiver. —

Defendant waived his right to challenge the factual basis of a restitution order because he entered into a plea agreement providing that restitution would be determined and did not object to the final amount of restitution ordered by the district court. Smith v. State, 2012 WY 130, 286 P.3d 429,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 137

(Wyo. 2012).

Remand for recomputation not normally allowed. —

Where the initial computation of the amount of restitution is the result of a failure of proof, the supreme court will not normally remand for a recomputation unless it is remanding for other sentencing changes as well. Renfro v. State, 785 P.2d 491,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(Wyo. 1990).

Cost for changing locks result of “criminal activity.” —

An order of restitution for the costs associated with the changing of the victim's locks was proper where the victim had her locks changed as a result of the defendant's criminal activity in burglarizing her home. Dreiman v. State, 825 P.2d 758,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(Wyo. 1992).

Court properly required defendant pay child support for victim's daughter,

where the defendant admitted to unlawful sexual intrusion with the victim which could reasonably have been considered to have resulted in the pregnancy. Jackson v. State, 891 P.2d 70,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 36

(Wyo. 1995).

Court cannot require body tissue, sperm specimen. —

Part of the sentence ordering the defendant convicted of second-degree sexual assault to leave a sample of body tissue or sperm specimen for use in future DNA testing was beyond the court's authority. Jackson v. State, 891 P.2d 70,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 36

(Wyo. 1995).

Causation not shown. —

Restitution for the amount lost due to a victim's inability to secure loans after defendant allegedly ruined his credit was improperly awarded because causation was not established; there was no evidence that the victim would have qualified for the loans absent defendant's criminal conduct.
Hampton v. State, 2006 WY 103, 141 P.3d 101,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 107

(Wyo. 2006).

Specific finding only when no ability to pay. —

In a welfare fraud case, restitution was properly ordered in the amount of $ 90,722.79 because a district court did not have to make findings concerning the amount of defendant's income and other financial obligations in the absence of an express finding that defendant did not have the ability to pay. Defendant was thirty-one years old, had a general equivalency diploma, and had been employed at a job prior to a work injury in which her annual take-home pay was approximately $24,000. Shafer v. State, 2015 WY 38, 344 P.3d 284,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 42

(Wyo. 2015).

Applied

in

Shongutsie v. State, 827 P.2d 361,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo. 1992); Leach v. State, 836 P.2d 336,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 118

(Wyo. 1992); Brenning v. State, 870 P.2d 349,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(Wyo. 1994); Fales v. State, 908 P.2d 404,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 214

(Wyo. 1995); Alcaraz v. State, 2002 WY 57, 44 P.3d 68,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 58

(Wyo. 2002).

Quoted

in

Hart v. State, 2002 WY 3, 37 P.3d 1286,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(Wyo. 2002); Guinard v. State, 2014 WY 140,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 162

(Nov. 5, 2014).

Stated

in

Keller v. State, 723 P.2d 1244,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 604

(Wyo. 1986).

Cited

in

Perritt v. State, 2005 WY 121, 120 P.3d 181,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 147

(2005).

Nixon v. State, 4 P.3d 864,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 97

(Wyo. 2000); Graham v. State, 2001 WY 5, 16 P.3d 712,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(Wyo. 2001); Jones v. State, 2002 WY 35, 41 P.3d 1247,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 38

(Wyo. 2002); Penner v. State, 2003 WY 143, 78 P.3d 1045,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 173

(Wyo. 2003)King v. Wyo. Dep't of Transp., 2007 WY 109, 161 P.3d 1086,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 116

(July 12, 2007).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Measure and elements of restitution to which victim is entitled under state criminal statute, 15 ALR5th 391.

Requirement, as condition of probation, pursuant to 18 USC § 3651, that defendant make restitution to aggrieved parties, 71 ALR Fed 789.

Restitutional sentencing under Victim and Witness Protection Act § 5 (18 USC §§ 3579, 3580) [ 18 USC §§ 3663, 3664], 79 ALR Fed 724.

Deductibility, as nonbusiness loss under 26 USC § 165(c)(2), of restitution payments made pursuant to sentencing order, 112 ALR Fed 289.

§ 7-9-104.
Preparation of plan; contents.

In any case in which the court has ordered restitution under W.S.

7-9-102

,

7-9-113

or

7-13-301

, if the sentencing court orders suspended imposition of sentence, suspended sentence or probation, the court shall require that the defendant in cooperation with the probation and parole officer assigned to the defendant, or in the case of unsupervised probation any probation and parole officer or any other person the court directs, promptly prepare a plan of restitution including the name and address of each victim, the amount of restitution determined to be owed to each victim pursuant to W.S.

7-9-103

or

7-9-114

and a schedule of restitution payments. If the defendant is presently unable to make any restitution but there is a reasonable possibility that the defendant may be able to do so at some time during his probation period, the plan of restitution shall also state the conditions under which or the event after which the defendant shall make restitution. In structuring a plan for reimbursement under this section, victim restitution shall be paid in the following order:

Pecuniary damages suffered by the victim which have not been paid by insurance or from the crime victim’s compensation account;

Payment of other amounts owed by the defendant arising from the case.

History.

Laws 1980, ch. 34, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 7-13-308; Laws 1983, ch. 162, § 1; 1984, ch. 27, § 2; 1987, ch. 157, § 3; 1991, ch. 77, § 1; ch. 155, § 1; ch. 167, § 2; 2000, ch. 90, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Applicability. —

This section did not give the trial court authority to require defendant to make a “bona fide effort” to have a total $335,387 of restitution paid within a five-year period. Defendant's one-year jail sentence was not suspended and he was not given probation; therefore, his sentence was not a sentence for which a restitution plan could be imposed.
Smith v. State, 2012 WY 130, 286 P.3d 429,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 137

(Wyo. 2012).

Court's authority.—

Statutory requirement for a restitution plan may contemplate that restitution-related conditions be included in a restitution plan, but it contains no language restricting a sentencing court’s authority to impose such conditions outside a formalized restitution plan, and the requirement of a restitution plan does not act to constrain the court’s discretion over restitution terms. Anderson v. State, 2018 WY 6, 408 P.3d 1148,

2018 Wyo. LEXIS 6

(Wyo. 2018).

It would be nonsensical to allow the sentencing court full discretion to set restitution terms as part of a restitution plan, but declare that exercise of discretion invalid if the court orders the same terms as separate probation conditions, and there is nothing that requires such a result; a district court has authority to impose restitution-related probation conditions in a restitution plan or separately, and the district court did not abuse its discretion or exceed its authority in imposing such conditions in this case. Anderson v. State, 2018 WY 6, 408 P.3d 1148,

2018 Wyo. LEXIS 6

(Wyo. 2018).

Restitution withdrawn from prison earnings. —

District court did not by ordering restitution that the Department of Corrections could withdraw from defendant's prison earnings because unless the district court found that defendant was unable to pay restitution, it was required to set the total amount she had to repay the victim, and its order to that effect constituted a judgment upon which the victim could execute. McEwan v. State, 2013 WY 158, 314 P.3d 1160,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 164

(Wyo. 2013).

Absent statutory authority, sentencing court has no power to order restitution.

Bishop v. State, 687 P.2d 242,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 310

(Wyo. 1984), cert. denied, 469 U.S. 1219, 105 S. Ct. 1203, 84 L. Ed. 2d 345, 1985 U.S. LEXIS 998 (U.S. 1985).

Under former law, sentence which required restitution to victim was illegal

because neither this section nor any other section authorized restitution when the defendant is sentenced to incarceration. Barnes v. State, 670 P.2d 302,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 368

(Wyo. 1983).

Probation revocation unconstitutional absent capacity to pay. —

The convicted person cannot be subjected to revocation of probation for noncompliance with restitution unless, in accord with the statutes, a plan has been developed which demonstrates the required criteria, including capacity to pay. In the absence of capacity to pay with reasonable effort made, imprisonment for debt occurs in contravention of art. 1, § 5, Wyo. Const.Seaton v. State, 811 P.2d 276,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 79

(Wyo. 1991).

Cited

in

Badura v. State, 832 P.2d 1390,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 72

(Wyo. 1992); Hart v. State, 2002 WY 3, 37 P.3d 1286,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(Wyo. 2002).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Reforming Criminal Sentencing in Wyoming,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 575 (1985).

For comment, “Victim Compensation and Restitution: Legislative Alternatives,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 681 (1985).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Requirement, as condition of probation, pursuant to 18 USC § 3651 [Repealed], that defendant make restitution to aggrieved parties, 71 ALR Fed 789.

§ 7-9-105.
Submission of plan to court; approval or modification.

The defendant’s plan of restitution and the comments of the probation and parole officer or any other person directed by the court to assist in the preparation of the restitution plan shall be submitted promptly to the court. The court shall promptly enter an order approving the plan or modifying it and providing for restitution payments to the extent that the defendant is or may become reasonably able to make restitution, taking into account the factors enumerated in W.S.

7-9-106

. The court may modify the plan at any time upon the defendant’s request, upon the court’s own motion and, for those cases within the provisions of W.S.

7-9-113

through

7-9-115

, upon the motion of the victim.

History.

Laws 1980, ch. 34, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 7-13-309; Laws 1987, ch. 157, § 3; 1991, ch. 155, § 1; ch. 167, § 2.

Cited

in

Hart v. State, 2002 WY 3, 37 P.3d 1286,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(Wyo. 2002); Shafer v. State, 2015 WY 38,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 42

(Mar. 9, 2015).

§ 7-9-106.
Factors considered by probation and parole officer, and by court.

The probation and parole officer or other person directed by the court when assisting the defendant in preparing the plan of restitution, and the court before approving or modifying the plan of restitution, shall consider:

The number of victims;

The pecuniary damages of each victim including, for those cases within the provisions of W.S.

7-9-113

through

7-9-115

, the long-term physical health care cost of the victim;

The defendant’s:

Physical and mental health and condition;

Age;

Education;

Employment circumstances;

Potential for employment and vocational training;

Family circumstances; and

Financial condition and whether the defendant has an ability to pay or whether a reasonable probability exists that the defendant will have an ability to pay.

Whether compensation has been paid to any victim under the Crime Victims Compensation Act [§§

1-40-101

through

1-40-119

];

What plan of restitution will most effectively aid the rehabilitation of the defendant; and

Other appropriate factors.

History.

Laws 1980, ch. 34, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 7-13-310; Laws 1987, ch. 157, § 3; 1991, ch. 155, § 1; ch. 167, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Restitution proper. —

There was nothing unreasonable in the district court's requirement that the defendant work more hours in order to pay restitution to burglary victims, hours that the defendant originally stated that he worked anyway. Hart v. State, 2002 WY 3, 37 P.3d 1286,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(Wyo. 2002).

Cited

in

Jones v. State, 2002 WY 35, 41 P.3d 1247,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 38

(Wyo. 2002).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Vulnerability of victim as aggravating factor under state sentencing guidelines, 73 ALR5th 383.

Deductibility, as nonbusiness loss under 26 USC § 165(c)(2), of restitution payments made pursuant to sentencing order, 112 ALR Fed 289.

§ 7-9-107.
Notice to victims.

The probation and parole officer or other person directed by the court to assist in preparation of the restitution plan shall attempt to determine the name and address of each victim and the amount of his pecuniary damages and may rely on a victim’s impact statement made pursuant to W.S.

7-21-101

through

7-21-103

.

The clerk of the court shall mail to each known victim a copy of the court’s order approving or modifying the plan of restitution.

History.

Laws 1980, ch. 34, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 7-13-311; Laws 1987, ch. 157, § 3; 1990, ch. 112, § 2; 1991, ch. 155, § 1; ch. 167, § 2.

§ 7-9-108.
Compliance with plan as condition of probation or suspension; payments to clerk.

Compliance with the plan of restitution as approved or modified by the court shall be a condition of the defendant’s probation or suspension.

Restitution payments by the defendant shall be made payable to the office of the clerk in a form acceptable to the clerk.

Any restitution payment mailed to the last known address of the victim and returned to the clerk without a forwarding address shall be held by the clerk for a period of one (1) year following the date of receipt of the returned payment. A victim who fails to claim the returned payment or to provide a forwarding address within the one (1) year period forfeits his right to the payment and the clerk shall forward the amount of payment to the victim services division within the office of the attorney general for deposit in the account established under W.S.

1-40-114

.

History.

Laws 1980, ch. 34, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 7-13-312; Laws 1987, ch. 157, § 3; 1989, ch. 54, § 1; 1998, ch. 81, § 2.

§ 7-9-109.
Failure to comply; modification or extension of plan.

Failure of the defendant to comply with W.S.

7-9-104

or to comply with the plan of restitution as approved or modified by the court is a violation of the conditions of probation. If the probation period has expired, the restitution order may be enforced by either civil or criminal contempt proceedings. Criminal contempt under this section is punishable by imprisonment for not more than one (1) year. The court may modify the plan of restitution or extend the period of time for restitution, but, except for those cases falling within the provisions of W.S.

7-9-113

through

7-9-115

, the court may not extend the period of time for restitution beyond ten (10) years following the date of the defendant’s discharge from sentence or expiration of probation under W.S.

7-13-301

.

History.

Laws 1980, ch. 34, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 7-13-313; Laws 1987, ch. 157, § 3; 1991, ch. 167, § 2; 1995, ch. 36, § 1; 2000, ch. 90, § 1.

Cited

in

Daniels v. State, 909 P.2d 972,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(Wyo. 1996).

§ 7-9-110.
Civil action.

Proceedings, orders and judgments under W.S.

7-9-101

through

7-9-115

shall not estop, limit or impair the rights of victims to sue and recover damages from the defendant in a separate civil action. Any restitution payment by the defendant to a victim shall be set off against any judgment in favor of the victim, however, in a civil action arising out of the same facts or event.

The fact that restitution was required or made shall not be admissible as evidence in a civil action unless offered by the defendant.

History.

Laws 1980, ch. 34, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 7-13-314; Laws 1987, ch. 157, § 3; 1991, ch. 167, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to crime victims compensation, see chapter 40 of title 1.

§ 7-9-111.
Limitations on duty of prosecutor; victim's remedy.

Except as provided by W.S. 7-9-103(a), the prosecuting attorney has no obligation to investigate alleged pecuniary damages or to petition the court for restitution on behalf of a victim. In the event that the victim is not satisfied with the restitution plan approved or modified by the court, the victim’s sole and exclusive remedy is a civil action.

History.

Laws 1980, ch. 34, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 7-13-315; Laws 1987, ch. 157, § 3; 2000, ch. 90, § 1.

§ 7-9-112.
Check fraud.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, the sentencing court may require any person convicted of check fraud to make restitution in an amount not to exceed twice the amount of the dishonored check in addition to any other punishment imposed under W.S.

6-3-702

.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3; W.S. 1977, §

6-3-702

; Laws 1983, ch. 96, § 2; ch. 171, § 1; 1984, ch. 44, §§ 2, 3; 1987, ch. 157, § 3.

Cited

in

King v. Wyo. Dep't of Transp., 2007 WY 109, 161 P.3d 1086,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 116

(July 12, 2007).